Utah statutes.
75-6-304.   Registration in beneficiary form -- Applicable law.
A security may be registered in beneficiary form if the form is authorized by
this or a similar statute of the state of organization of the issuer or
registering entity, the location of the registering entity's principal office,
the office of its transfer agent or its office making the registration, or by
this or similar statute of the law of the state listed as the owner's address
at the time of registration.  A registration governed by the law of a
jurisdiction in which this or similar legislation is not in force or was not
in force when a registration in beneficiary form was made is nevertheless
presumed to be valid and authorized as a matter of contract law.
